Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.010

Contagious diseases, limiting contact—Rules.

The state board of health, after consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, shall adopt reasonable rules regarding the presence of persons on or about any school premises who have, or who have been exposed to, contagious diseases deemed by the state board of health as dangerous to the public health. Such rules shall specify reasonable and precautionary procedures as to such presence and/or readmission of such persons and may include the requirement for a certificate from a licensed physician that there is no danger of contagion. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide to appropriate school officials and personnel, access and notice of these rules of the state board of health. Providing online access to these rules satisfies the requirements of this section. The superintendent of public instruction is required to provide this notice only when there are significant changes to the rules.

[ 2009 c 556 s 3; 1971 c 32 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.31.010. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 262 s 5; RRS s 4689; prior: 1897 c 118 s 68; 1890 p 372 s 47. Formerly RCW 28A.31.010, 28.31.010.]